Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF55.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1955YH (6) 91 as/js H.F. 55 Section 1. Section 724.26, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. A person who is convicted of a felony in a state or 3 federal court, or who is adjudicated delinquent on the basis 4 of conduct that would constitute a felony if committed by an 5 adult, and who knowingly has under the personâs dominion and 6 control or possession, receives, or transports or causes to be 7 transported a firearm or offensive weapon is guilty of a class 8 âDâ felony the following: 9 (1) A class âDâ felony for a first offense, with commitment 10 to the custody of the director of the department of corrections 11 for an indeterminate term not to exceed five years with a 12 mandatory minimum term of confinement of two years . 13 (2) A class âDâ felony for a second offense, with commitment 14 to the custody of the director of the department of corrections 15 for an indeterminate term not to exceed five years with a 16 mandatory minimum term of confinement of four years. 17 (3) A class âCâ felony for a third offense, with commitment 18 to the custody of the director of the department of corrections 19 for an indeterminate term not to exceed ten years with a 20 mandatory minimum term of confinement of seven years. 21 (4) A class âCâ felony for a fourth or subsequent offense, 22 with commitment to the custody of the director of the 23 department of corrections for an indeterminate term not to 24 exceed ten years with a mandatory minimum term of confinement 25 of ten years. 26 b. The court shall not defer judgment or sentencing, 27 or suspend execution of any mandatory minimum sentence of 28 incarceration imposed by this subsection. 29